test/src/morphology/N-skeerm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sǩeeˊrm â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Nom: sǩeeˊrm
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Gen: sǩeeˊrm
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Acc: sǩeeˊrm
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Ill: sǩeerma
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Loc: sǩeeˊrmest
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Com: sǩeeˊrmin
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Ess: sǩeeˊrmen
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Par: sǩeeˊrmed
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Sg+Abe: sǩeeˊrmtää
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Nom: sǩeeˊrm
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Gen: sǩeeˊrmi
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Acc: sǩeeˊrmid
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Ill: sǩeeˊrmid
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Loc: sǩeeˊrmin
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Com: sǩeeˊrmivuiˊm
     sǩeeˊrm+N+Pl+Abe: sǩeeˊrmitää
     
